Nebraska, session 109, LB613A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $90,200 from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $88,000 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 613, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $64,100 for FY2025-26 or
$66,200 for FY2026-27.
-1-